Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2936
Prohibited mediator reports.

(a) Except as required in subsection (b) of this section, a mediator may not make a report, assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other communication regarding a mediation to a court, administrative agency, or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute that is the subject of the mediation.

(b) A mediator may disclose:

(1) whether the mediation occurred or has terminated, whether a settlement was reached, and attendance;

(2) a mediation communication as permitted under section 25-2935; or

(3) a mediation communication evidencing abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of an individual to a public agency responsible for protecting individuals against such mistreatment.

(c) A communication made in violation of subsection (a) of this section may not be considered by a court, administrative agency, or arbitrator.

Laws 2003, LB 255, § 7.